Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 55
UNIFORM FACSIMILE SIGNATURE
OF PUBLIC OFFICIALS ACT

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 6 of chapter 125, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1969, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1969, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Section

11-55-101. Short title.

Sections 11-55-101 to 11-55-106 shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Facsimile Signature of Public Officials Act".

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 1082, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-6-1.

11-55-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authorized officer" means any official of this state or any of its departments, agencies, institutions, or other instrumentalities, or any of its political subdivisions, whose signature to a public security or instrument of payment is required or permitted.

"Facsimile signature" means a reproduction by engraving, imprinting, stamping, or other means of the manual signature of an authorized officer.

"Instrument of payment" means a check, draft, warrant, or order for the payment, delivery, or transfer of funds.

"Public security" means a bond, note, or other obligation for the payment of money, issued by this state or by any of its departments, agencies, institutions, or other instrumentalities, or by any of its political subdivisions.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 1082, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-6-2.

11-55-103. Facsimile signature.

Any authorized officer, after filing with the secretary of state his manual signature certified by him under oath, may execute or cause to be executed with a facsimile signature in lieu of his manual signature:

Any public security, but at least one signature required or permitted to be placed thereon shall be manually subscribed; and

Any instrument of payment.

Upon compliance with this article by the authorized officer, his facsimile signature has the same legal effect as his manual signature.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 1082, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-6-3.

Cross references:

For effect of facsimile signatures on sewer system revenue bonds, see § 31-35-404 (7).

11-55-104. Use of facsimile seal.

When the seal of this state or of any of its departments, agencies, institutions, or other instrumentalities, or of any of its political subdivisions, is required in the execution of a public security or instrument of payment, the authorized officer may cause the seal to be printed, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed in facsimile thereon. The facsimile seal has the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 1083, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-6-4.

11-55-105. Violation - penalty.

Any person who with intent to defraud uses on a public security or an instrument of payment: A facsimile signature, or any reproduction of it, of any authorized officer; or any facsimile seal, or any reproduction of it, of this state or any of its departments, agencies, institutions, or other instrumentalities, or of any of its political subdivisions, commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 1083, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-6-5.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 871, § 28, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 823, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1472, § 44, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 574 (1980).

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

11-55-106. Uniformity of interpretation.

This article shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 1083, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-6-6.

11-55-107. Limitations on actions brought.

No action based upon any public security authorized and issued on or after July 1, 1969, shall be commenced more than eighteen years after the final maturity date of the issue of which such public security is one.

No action based upon any public security issued prior to July 1, 1969, shall be commenced more than eighteen years after the final maturity date of the issue of which such public security is one.

No action based upon any claim for interest accrued on any public security, whether said claim is evidenced by interest coupons or not, shall be commenced after action based upon said public security has been barred.

The provisions of this section shall be inoperative as to any public security unless the treasurer of the issuing political subdivision at least six months and not more than twelve months prior has sent to the holder of record of such public security, at his last known address as shown on the books of such treasurer, a notice of the provisions of this section. A copy of such letter of notice held in such treasurer's records shall be conclusive proof that the requirements of this subsection (4) have been complied with.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 1083, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-6-7.

11-55-108. Trust or fiduciary relationship between issuer and holder.

Any trust or fiduciary relationship between the issuer of any public security and the holder thereof, regarding the principal of or interest on such security, shall be conclusively presumed to have been repudiated on the maturity date of such security unless the same is presented for payment before the expiration of the applicable limitation period set forth in sections 11-55-107 to 11-55-110.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 1083, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-6-8.

11-55-109. Moneys to revert to general or other fund.

Any public moneys from whatever source derived remaining in any fund or account reserved, pledged, or otherwise held for payment of the principal of or interest on any public security on which action for collection has been barred shall revert to the general fund of the issuing authority.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 1083, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-6-9.

11-55-110. Payment authorized although suit for recovery barred.

Nothing contained in sections 11-55-107 to 11-55-110 shall be so construed as to prevent the payment of any public security, or the interest having accrued thereon prior to or at its maturity, after the period specified in section 11-55-107 has passed, and the issuing body of such public security is authorized by sections 11-55-107 to 11-55-110 to make such payment if it deems it in its best interests so to do.

Source:

L. 69:

R&RE, p. 1084, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-6-10.